Missouri, session 2026, SB1490.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 376.427 and 376.1575, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 376.427 and 376.1575, to read as follows:
376.427. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Health benefit plan", as such term is defined in
section 376.1350. The term health benefit plan shall also
include a prepaid dental plan, as defined in section 354.700;
(2) "Health care services", medical, surgical, dental,
podiatric, pharmaceutical, chiropractic, licensed ambulance
service, and optometric services;
(3) "Health carrier" or "carrier", as such term is
defined in section 376.1350. The term health carrier or
carrier shall also include a prepaid dental plan
corporation, as defined in section 354.700;
(4) "Insured", any person entitled to benefits under a
contract of accident and sickness insurance, or medical-
payment insurance issued as a supplement to liability
insurance but not including any other coverages contained in
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1490 2
a liability or a workers' compensation policy, issued by an
insurer;
(5) "Insurer", any person, reciprocal exchange,
interinsurer, fraternal benefit society, health services
corporation, self-insured group arrangement to the extent
not prohibited by federal law, prepaid dental plan
corporation as defined in section 354.700, or any other
legal entity engaged in the business of insurance;
(6) "Provider", a physician, hospital, dentist,
podiatrist, chiropractor, athletic trainer, pharmacy,
licensed ambulance service, or optometrist, licensed by this
state.
2. Upon receipt of an assignment of benefits made by
the insured to a provider, the insurer shall issue the
instrument of payment for a claim for payment for health
care services in the name of the provider. All claims shall
be paid within thirty days of the receipt by the insurer of
all documents reasonably needed to determine the claim.
3. Nothing in this section shall preclude an insurer
from voluntarily issuing an instrument of payment in the
single name of the provider.
4. Except as provided in subsection 5 of this section,
this section shall not require any insurer, health services
corporation, prepaid dental plan as defined in section
354.700, health maintenance corporation or preferred
provider organization which directly contracts with certain
members of a class of providers for the delivery of health
care services to issue payment as provided pursuant to this
section to those members of the class which do not have a
contract with the insurer.
5. When a patient's health benefit plan does not
include or require payment to out-of-network providers for

SB 1490 3
all or most covered services, which would otherwise be
covered if the patient received such services from a
provider in the health benefit plan's network, including but
not limited to health maintenance organization plans, as
such term is defined in section 354.400, or a health benefit
plan offered by a carrier consistent with subdivision (19)
of section 376.426, payment for all services shall be made
directly to the providers when the health carrier has
authorized such services to be received from a provider
outside the health benefit plan's network.
6. Payments made to providers under this section shall
be subject to the provisions of section 376.383. Entities
that are not currently subject to the provisions of section
376.383 shall have a delayed effective date of January 1,
2026 to be subject to such provisions.
376.1575. As used in sections 376.1575 to [376.1580]
376.1578, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Completed application", a practitioner's
application to a health carrier that seeks the health
carrier's authorization for the practitioner to provide
patient care services as a member of the health carrier's
network and does not omit any information which is clearly
required by the application form and the accompanying
instructions;
(2) "Credentialing", a health carrier's process of
assessing and validating the qualifications of a
practitioner to provide patient care services and act as a
member of the health carrier's provider network;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning as such term is
defined in section 376.1350. The term health carrier shall
also include any entity described in subdivision (4) of
section 354.700;

SB 1490 4
(4) "Practitioner":
(a) A physician [or], physician assistant, or athletic
trainer eligible to provide treatment services under chapter
334;
(b) A pharmacist eligible to provide services under
chapter 338;
(c) A dentist eligible to provide services under
chapter 332;
(d) A chiropractor eligible to provide services under
chapter 331;
(e) An optometrist eligible to provide services under
chapter 336;
(f) A podiatrist eligible to provide services under
chapter 330;
(g) A psychologist or licensed clinical social worker
eligible to provide services under chapter 337; or
(h) An advanced practice nurse eligible to provide
services under chapter 335.
✓